Hawaii statutes.
§90-3 Rights, responsibilities, and
expectations in volunteer relationships. (a) Every person regardless of
his present economic condition, race, color, ancestry, political affiliation,
religious affiliation, sex, age, physical or mental handicap, or marital status
has the right to volunteer his services to an agency. An agency has the right
to decline any voluntary offer of services, or if accepted, to release
subsequently the volunteer who is no longer needed or who is found to be
unacceptable.

(b) A volunteer providing services to an
agency may expect:

(1) That he will be assigned a job that is worthwhile
and challenging, and which permits him the freedom to use existing skills or
develop new ones.

(2) That he will be trusted with information that
will help him carry out the assignment.

(3) That he will be kept informed about what is going
on in the specific volunteer areas.

(4) That he will be provided orientation, training,
and supervision for the job he accepts so he will know why he is being asked to
do a particular task.

(5) That his time will not be wasted by lack of
planning, coordination, and cooperation within the organization.

(6) That he will receive feedback as to whether his
work is effective and how it can be improved.

(7) That he will be reimbursed for out-of-pocket
costs if it is the only way he can volunteer.

(8) That he will receive letters of recommendation
and reference from his supervisor upon request.

(9) That he will be given appropriate recognition for
his volunteer services.

(10) That he will be provided a designated supervisor.

(c) A volunteer providing services to an
agency has the responsibility to:

(1) Accept assignments given to him.

(2) Fulfill his commitment or notify the designated
person of his change of plans.

(3) Follow guidelines and policies established by the
agency.

(4) Respect the values and beliefs of others.

(5) Use time wisely and not interfere with the job
performance of others.

(6) Provide feedback, suggestions, and
recommendations to his supervisor regarding the program.

(7) Be considerate, respect competencies, and work as
a member of a team with staff and other volunteers.

(d) The agency utilizing the services of
volunteers may expect:

(1) That the volunteer will fulfill his assignment as
agreed upon or will notify staff sufficiently in advance if he cannot complete
it.

(2) That the volunteer will not go beyond his
competencies and authority.

(3) That the volunteer will submit feedback,
suggestions, and recommendations about the program to his supervisor.

(4) That the volunteer will maintain confidentiality
and will respect and treat the recipients of volunteer services with dignity.

(e) The agency utilizing the services of
volunteers has the responsibility to:

(1) Use volunteers to extend services without
displacing paid employees.

(2) Provide each volunteer with a designated
supervisor.

(3) Provide staff orientation and training in the use
and supervision of volunteers.

(4) Define volunteer jobs that are meaningful to the
volunteer and commensurate with his abilities.

(5) Be alert to assignments for handicapped or
disabled volunteers.

(6) Make it possible for a volunteer to serve on a
trial or probationary basis for a specified period.

(7) Provide orientation and training to improve the
volunteer's skills.

(8) Provide volunteers with clear instructions and an
adequate work space.

(9) Accept the volunteer as part of the team,
including him in training and staff meetings that pertain to his work.

(10) Establish and communicate clearly defined lines
of supervision so that the volunteer knows to whom he is responsible.

(11) Provide appropriate recognition and appreciation
to the volunteer.

(12) Provide written guidelines governing the
recruitment, screening, utilization, and supervision of volunteers.

(13) Recognize an applicant's prior volunteer service
in evaluating fulfillment of training and experience requirements for state
employment pursuant to rules adopted by the department of human resources
development, the judiciary, and the board of regents of the University of
Hawaii.

(14) Provide funds for volunteer benefits as specified
in section 90-4.

(15) Provide recognition of paid staff for support and
supervision of volunteers. [L 1978, c 10, pt of §2; am L 1994, c 56, §21]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next